Arkansas, session 2025, HB1837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is vital to the operation of an effective democracy for
the people to have full and complete confidence in their elections;
(2) It is crucial that those elections be free of unwanted
foreign influence; and
(3) It is the intent of the General Assembly to prevent foreign
contributions from influencing the outcome of Arkansas elections.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-201, concerning definitions for
campaign financing, resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to add
*SSS058*
04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(19) "Prohibited sources" means the same as defined in § 7-9-
402.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-220(b), concerning contents of the
report for independent expenditures in campaign financing and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read
as follows:
(5) An affirmation by the individual, committee, or entity
making the independent expenditure that the individual, committee, or entity
has not knowingly or willfully accepted donations in excess of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate from one (1) or more prohibited sources
within the four-year period immediately preceding the date the independent
expenditure was made.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-9-402, concerning definitions for
disclosure matters referred to voters, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(13) “Directly or indirectly” means acting either alone or 10
jointly with, through, or on behalf of any other:
(A) Ballot question committee;
(B) Legislative question committee;
(C) Political action committee;
(D) Organization;
(E) Person; or
(F) Other entity;
(14) “Foreign national” means:
(A) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent
resident of the United States;
(B) A government or subdivision of a foreign country; or
(C) A foreign political party;
(D) An entity, including without limitation a partnership,
association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that
is organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of business in, a
foreign country; or
(E) A partnership, association, corporation, or
04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837
organization, which is wholly or majority owned by a foreign national,
unless:
(i) A contribution or expenditure the entity makes
derives entirely from funds generated by the entity’s operations; and
(ii) All decisions concerning the contribution or
expenditure are made by individuals who are United States citizens or
permanent residents, except for setting overall budget amounts;
(15) "Independent expenditure" means the same as defined in § 7-
6-201;
(16) "Preliminary activity" includes:
(A) Conducting a poll;
(B) Drafting ballot question language;
(C) Drafting legislative question language;
(D) Conducting a focus group;
(E) Conducting telephone calls; or
(F) Traveling in connection with a ballot question or
legislative question activity;
(17) “Prohibited sources” includes:
(A) A prohibited political action committee as defined in
§ 7-6-201;
(B) A political action committee that accepts one (1) or
more contributions from a foreign national;
(C) An organization that is funded by a political action
committee that accepts one (1) or more contributions from a foreign national;
(D) Contributions from or expenditures by a foreign
national; and
(E) Contributions or expenditures that violate state or
federal law; and
(18)(A) “Tax-exempt organization” means an organization that
qualifies as exempt from federal income tax under § 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) This subchapter shall not be construed to treat a
political organization under § 527 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
it existed on January 1, 2025, as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of
this subchapter.

04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-9-407(2), concerning the information
contained in financial reports submitted by a ballot question committee or a
legislative question committee, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(E) For a ballot question committee as defined under § 7-
9-402(2) or a legislative question committee as defined in § 7-9-402(10):
(i) An affirmation that the ballot question
committee or legislative question committee has not knowingly or willfully
received, solicited, or accepted contributions or expenditures from a
prohibited source; and
(ii) An affirmation by the treasurer of the ballot
question committee or legislative question committee that to the best of the
treasurer's knowledge the donor associated with each contribution is not a
foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully received, solicited, or
accepted, whether directly or indirectly, contributions or expenditures from
one (1) or more prohibited sources in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) in the aggregate within the four-year period immediately preceding
the date of the contribution;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 9, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
7-9-416. Prohibited sources of funding.
(a) Upon registering as a ballot question committee or legislative
question committee, the treasurer of the committee shall file an accompanying
certification that no preliminary activity was directly funded by prohibited
sources, whether directly or indirectly.
(b) After the ballot question committee or legislative question
committee has been registered, the committee shall not knowingly or willfully
receive, solicit, or accept contributions or expenditures from a prohibited
source, whether directly or indirectly.
(c) A person who makes an independent expenditure in support of or in
opposition to a ballot question committee or legislative question committee
in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate shall keep
records of any contribution or expenditure and retain such records as
prescribed under § 7-9-410 from the date of receipt of the contribution or
expenditure.
04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837

7-9-417. Donor certification of no affiliation with prohibited
sources.
(a) Upon receipt of a contribution in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) to a ballot question committee or legislative question committee,
the treasurer of the ballot question committee or legislative question
committee shall obtain from the donor associated with a contribution in
excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate an affirmation that
the donor:
(1) Is not a foreign national; and
(2) Has not knowingly or willfully accepted donations in excess
of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate from one (1) or more
prohibited sources within the four-year period immediately preceding the date
the contribution is made.
(b) An individual, committee, or entity making one (1) or more
independent expenditures in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
supporting or opposing a ballot question or legislative question shall
certify to the Attorney General that the individual, committee, or entity has
not knowingly or willfully accepted donations in excess of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate from one (1) or more prohibited sources
within the four-year period immediately preceding the date the independent
expenditure is made and that it will not do so through the remainder of the
calendar year in which the ballot question or legislative question will
appear on the ballot.

7-9-418. Prohibited influence by a foreign national.
(a) A foreign national shall not direct, dictate, control, or directly
or indirectly participate in the decision-making process of any person with
regard to that person’s activities to influence a ballot question or
legislative question, including without limitation decisions concerning the
making of contributions or expenditures to influence a ballot question or
legislative question.
(b) A foreign national shall not solicit, directly or indirectly, the
making of a donation, contribution, or expenditure by another person to
influence a ballot question or legislative question.
(c) Nothing in this subchapter shall create or eliminate any existing
04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837
donor disclosure rights or duties beyond those specifically stated in §§ 7-9-
416 – 7-9-420.

7-9-419. Enforcement for violations of ban on foreign funding for
ballot questions and legislative questions.
(a)(1) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to enforce §§ 7-
9-416 – 7-9-420.
(2) An individual, committee, or entity alleged to have violated
any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420 shall be provided a full opportunity
of notice, discovery, and an opportunity to be heard before being found
liable for a violation of any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420.
(b) If the Attorney General prevails in an action brought under § 7-9-
419(a), the court shall award:
(1) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from
violating this subchapter or engaging in acts that aid or abet violations of
any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420; and
(2) Statutory damages up to twice the amount of the prohibited
contribution or expenditure.
(c) In addition to the penalties in this section and any other
remedies provided by law, if the court finds the defendant knowingly or
willfully violated any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420, the court may
assess a penalty of up to three (3) times the statutory damages.

7-9-420. Restrictions on collection and release of donor information.
(a)(1) A lawful donor to a tax-exempt organization possesses a right
of privacy in the lawful donor's donations.
(2) An investigation of an alleged violation of any provision
under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420 or a lawful court order in an action brought under
§ 7-9-419(a) shall occur in a manner that shields the identity of lawful
donors to the extent possible.
(3) A governmental body shall not collect or require the
submission of information on the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt
organization other than those directly related to an alleged violation of §§
7-9-416 – 7-9-420.
(4) Any collection or required submission of information by any
governmental body regarding the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt
04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 S4/9/25 HB1837
organization beyond that permitted by any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-
420 shall be deemed a violation of the Personal Information Protection Act, §
4-110-101 et seq.
(b)(1) A governmental body shall not disclose to the public or another
government official not directly involved in the investigation, information
revealing the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt organization, unless the
information is regarding the identity of a donor that engaged in conduct
prohibited by any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420 after a final
determination has been made that the donor violated any provision under §§ 7-
9-416 – 7-9-420 or if the tax-exempt organization has triggered registration
and reporting as a ballot question committee or a legislative question
committee under this subchapter.
(2) Knowing or willful violations of this subsection shall be
punishable under the Personal Information Protection Act, § 4-110-101 et seq.
(3) Any public disclosure of information revealing the identity
of any donor to a tax-exempt organization by a governmental body incident to
this section is a violation of the Personal Information Protection Act, § 4-
110-101 et seq., unless the information is regarding the identity of a donor
that engaged in conduct prohibited by any provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-
420 after a final determination has been made that the donor violated any
provision under §§ 7-9-416 – 7-9-420.

/s/McAlindon













04-09-2025 14:01:38 SSS058